Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-4305
Burnt lime, defined.

Burnt lime shall mean a material made from limestone which consists essentially of calcium oxide or a combination of calcium oxide with magnesium oxide.

Laws 1981, LB 396, § 5.